Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.585

Basis for protective arrangement instead of guardianship for adult.

(1) After the hearing on a petition under RCW 11.130.270 for a guardianship or under RCW 11.130.580(2) for a protective arrangement instead of guardianship, the court may issue an order under subsection (2) of this section for a protective arrangement instead of guardianship if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

(a) The respondent lacks the ability to meet essential requirements for physical health, safety, or self-care because the respondent is unable to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions, even with appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making; and

(b) The respondent's identified needs cannot be met by a less restrictive alternative.

(2) If the court makes the findings under subsection (1) of this section, the court, instead of appointing a guardian, may:

(a) Authorize or direct a transaction necessary to meet the respondent's need for health, safety, or care, including:

(i) A particular medical treatment or refusal of a particular medical treatment; or

(ii) Visitation or supervised visitation between the respondent and another person;

(b) Restrict access to the respondent by a specified person whose access places the respondent at serious risk of physical, psychological, or financial harm; and

(c) Reorder other arrangements on a limited basis that are appropriate.

(3) In deciding whether to issue an order under this section, the court shall consider the factors under RCW 11.130.330 and 11.130.335 that a guardian must consider when making a decision on behalf of an adult subject to guardianship.

[ 2020 c 312 s 315; 2019 c 437 s 502.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.